North Dakota, session 69, SB2230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 16.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Secretary of state to distribute information to qualified electors regarding ballot measures.
1. For each statewide constitutional measure approved by the legislative assembly, initiated
measure, or referendum appearing on the ballot of a special, primary, or general election, the
secretary of state shall create and distribute objective and factual educational materials to
each individual listed as "active voter" in the central voter file not less than forty - five days
before the election at which the question will be voted upon. Materials created under this
subsection also must be posted at all voting locations.
2. The materials created and distributed under subsection 1 must contain :
a. An objective summary of the measure;
b. The anticipated fiscal impact of the measure;
c. Whether the measure was approved by the legislative assembly or originated as an
initiative or referred petition; and
d. An objective analysis of a vote in favor and a vote opposed.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SECRETARY OF STATE - BALLOT MEASURE EDUCATIONAL
MATERIALS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in
the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $600,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the secretary of state for the purpose of creating and distributing objective and factual
educational materials focusing on the accuracy, fairness, and readability of measures placed on a
statewide election ballot as provided in section 1 of this Act, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027. The funding in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 3. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through June 30, 2027, and after that date is
ineffective.

S. B. NO. 2230 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2230.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 5 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State